Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-128
Special tax; submission to voters; election; laws applicable.

At the time specified in such notice a vote of the qualified electors shall be taken in each precinct at the place designated in such notice. The votes shall be received, and returns thereof made, and the same shall be canvassed by the same officers and in the same manner as required at each general election.

Laws 1879, § 29, p. 364;

R.S.1913, § 958;

C.S.1922, § 858;

C.S.1929, § 26-112;

R.S.1943, § 23-128.

For canvass and return of votes, see Chapter 32, article 10.